Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2817
Municipality; payments to municipal county; when; amount; how determined.

(1) Any municipality that is within the boundaries of a municipal county that is not merged into the municipal county shall be required to pay the municipal county for services that were previously provided by the county and are not ordinarily provided by a municipality. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amount paid shall be equal to the attributable cost of county services times a ratio, the numerator of which is the total valuation of all municipalities that are within the boundaries of the municipal county and the denominator of which is the total valuation of the municipal county and all municipalities and unconsolidated sanitary and improvement districts that are within the boundaries of the municipal county that are not merged into the municipal county, times a ratio the numerator of which is the valuation of the particular municipality and the denominator of which is the total valuation of all municipalities that are within the boundaries of the municipal county, except that (a) the amount paid shall not exceed the total taxable valuation of the municipality times forty-five hundredths of one percent and (b) the municipality shall not be required to pay the municipal county for fire protection or ambulance services.

(2) The amount paid for law enforcement by a municipality that is within the boundaries of a municipal county but is not merged into the municipal county shall be as follows: (a) If the county did not provide law enforcement services prior to the formation of the municipal county or if the municipality continues its own law enforcement services after formation of the municipal county, the total cost of services budgeted by the municipal county for law enforcement shall be the net cost of services that are the express and exclusive duties and responsibilities of the county sheriff by law times the same ratios calculated in subsection (1) of this section; (b) if the municipality discontinues providing law enforcement services after the formation of the municipal county (i) the municipal county shall provide a level of service in such municipality that is equal to the level provided in the area or areas of the municipal county that were municipalities prior to the formation of the municipal county and (ii) the municipality shall pay the municipal county for the cost of county services for law enforcement as calculated in subsection (1) of this section, except that for the first five years, the amount shall be no more than the amount budgeted by the municipality for law enforcement services in the last year the municipality provided the services for itself; and (c) if the municipal county has deputized the police force of the municipality to perform the express and exclusive duties and responsibilities of the county sheriff by law, there shall be no amount paid to the municipal county for law enforcement services.

(3) Disputes regarding the amounts any municipality that is within the boundaries of a municipal county that is not merged into the municipal county must pay to the municipal county for services that were previously provided by the county and are not ordinarily provided by a municipality shall be heard in the district court of such municipal county.

(4) For purposes of this section and section 13-2818, attributable cost of county services means the total budgeted cost of services that were previously provided by the county for the immediately prior fiscal year times a ratio, the numerator of which is the property tax request of the municipal county or the county and all cities to be consolidated for the prior fiscal year, not including any tax for bonded indebtedness, and the denominator of which is the total revenue from all sources that was budgeted for the immediately prior fiscal year by the municipal county or the county and all cities to be consolidated.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 17;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 16.